Hawaii, session 2026, GM1193.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. This Act shall be known and may be cited as the
"Hawaii Ratepayer Protection Act of 2026".
SECTION 2. The legislature finds that, in 2018, the
legislature enacted the Hawaii Ratepayer Protection Act to
provide proactive protections to the State’s electric utility
customers. Act 5, Session Laws of Hawaii 2018 (Act 5), provided
that electric utility rates would be considered just and
reasonable only if they are derived from a performance-based
model for determining utility revenues. Act 5 emphasized that
the State should adjust electric utilities' interests to better
align with customers’ interests. The legislature found that
there was "extraordinary urgency" for this realignment.
Act 5 directed the public utilities commission to establish
a performance-based model for utility regulation and ratemaking
based on performance incentives that "directly tie an electric
[utility’s] revenues to that utility’s achievement on
performance metrics and break the direct link between allowed
2026-2428 SB2487 GDI SMA-l.docx
HniiiMHiimiiiiiiM

Page 2 S.B. NO. 2487
S.D. 1
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
revenues and investment levels." The intent of this
performance-based model was to depart from the traditional
cost-of-service model that rewards utilities for increasing the
utility's capital expenditures and bases allowed revenues on the
value of the rate base, irrespective of the utility's
performance. The legislature recognized that the traditional
model misaligned the interests of customers and utilities
because it created a possible bias toward utilities that
expended capital on utility-owned projects, rather than
utilities that supported more efficient or cost-effective
options like customer-owned distributed energy resources or
independent, third-party projects. The legislature concluded
that the State needed a shift away from the traditional focus on
utility costs to a more modern focus on performance.
The legislature further finds that, in response to the
Hawaii Ratepayer Protection Act, the public utilities commission
opened its performance-based regulation proceeding as a
historic, multi-phase process that included participation from
local and national experts. In December 2020, the commission
established a comprehensive framework for performance-based
regulation that has since been nationally recognized as a
2026-2428 SB2487 CDl SMA-l.docx
■MMiiiiiniinniiiifflH

Page 3 S.B. NO. 2487
S.D. 1
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
leading model. The guiding principles for this framework
include a customer-centric approach, including day-one savings
for customers, administrative efficiency through a simplified
regulatory framework, and utility financial integrity with the
opportunity to earn profits and rewards through performance.
The main features of the framework include a multi-year rate
period of five years, during which the utility's allowed
revenues are determined not by traditional rate cases but by an
objective index tied to general inflation. The utility's
profits are driven largely by its ability to capture cost
savings and efficiencies. The framework also includes
performance incentive mechanisms to reward or penalize a utility
based on its performance on public interest priorities like
reliability, accelerated progress toward renewable energy, and
improved customer service. The commission emphasized that, with
the transition away from traditional cost-of-service regulation,
customers would benefit from lower utility costs.
In establishing the performance-based framework, the public
utilities commission recognized the need for a transformative
and lasting shift away from cost-of-service regulation. The
commission made clear that, after the five-year rate control
2026-2428 SB2487 CDl SMA-l.docx 3
IHlinilHHHMIHIIH

Page 4 S.B. NO. 2487
S.D. 1
H,D. 1
C.D. 1
period, the commission anticipated continuing to refine the
performance-based framework and did not envision returning to
cost-of-service regulation. However, now that the end of the
rate control period is approaching, the legislature is concerned
about the integrity of the performance-based framework and the
commission's compliance with the Hawaii Ratepayer Protection
Act. For example, last year, the commission adopted the
utility's proposal to initiate a traditional, cost-of-service
rate to "re-base" the utility's allowed revenues using its
projected increased costs. This cost-based rebasing of revenues
backtracks on the progress and reforms the State has made and
violates the commission's previous commitment not to return to
cost-of-service regulation.
The legislature is also aware that the public utilities
commission has insisted on requiring a "forward test year"
approach to the rate case, in which a utility requests a rate
increase based on future cost projections. This return to
forecast cost-of-service ratemaking encourages utilities to make
"wish lists" of capital projects to boost utility profits,
thereby inflating customer rates. Jurisdictions using forecast
2026-2428 SB2487 CDl SMA-l.docx

Page 5
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
costs instead of historical costs end up paying substantially
higher rates.
The legislature recognizes that the public utilities
commission has expressed the belief that it is constrained by
existing legal provisions to follow certain traditional
cost-bound methods, notwithstanding the mandates of the Hawaii
Ratepayer Protection Act. As a result, the commission is
inviting a return to "cost-plus" ratemaking that threatens to
undermine the benefits and progress achieved under the
performance-based framework. This poses the risk of significant
rate increases for customers.
Based on this stance by the public utilities commission and
the risk of rate increases for customers, the legislature
believes that further clarification and guidance are needed to
ensure that the commission upholds the legislature's original
intent under the Hawaii Ratepayer Protection Act and continues
the progress made under the commission's performance-based
regulatory framework. These clarifications will help ensure
that both electric utilities and ratepayers will continue to
benefit from the utilities' improved performance, lower costs,
and lower rates.
2026-2428 SB2487 CDl SMA-l.docx
HiMNIIIIIIHinnilllHIIIIIIII

Page 6 S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to provide
clarification and guidance by:
(1) Requiring the public utilities commission to establish
performance-based incentives, including revenue
adjustment mechanisms, cost control mechanisms, and
reward and penalty mechanisms on or before January 1,
2027; and
(2) Clarifying that the public utilities commission is
authorized to adopt alternative ratemaking procedures
to establish electric utility rates and performance­
based incentives.
SECTION 3. Section 269-16.1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§269-16.1 [rorformance incentive andpenalty-mcchaniomo.]
Performance-based incentives; regulation of electric utility
rates. (a) On or before January 1, [-S-OS-Ot-] 2027, the public
utilities commission shall establish [porfor-maftee]
performance-based incentives, including revenue adjustment
mechanisms, cost control mechanisms, and reward and penalty
mechanisms2_ that directly tie an electric [-[•] utility ’ s [-}-]
revenues to that utility's [achiovoment on] performance
2026-2428 SB2487 CDl SMA-l.docx 6
mmNiMiHiMWHiinii

Page 7
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
[FftefeFies-l and break the direct link between allowed revenues and
investment levels. The [per-forman-eo] performance-based
incentives [and- pcn-a-l-ty-mcchaniomo] , as may be amended by the
public utilities commission from time to time, shall apply to
the regulation of electric utility rates under [section 269-16.]
this chapter.
(b) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, including the
ratemaking procedures described in section 269-16, the public
utilities commission may adopt, by commission order, alternative
ratemaking procedures to establish electric utility rates and
performance-based incentives for purposes of subsection (a);
provided that the rates shall be derived from a
performance-based model for determining utility revenues.
[-( M-1 (c) In developing [performance iReefrt-we and penalty
mechan-i-smo, ] performance-based incentives, the public utilities
commission's review of electric utility performance shall
considerfv—bufe--not be limited ■ t-Oi ] the [following] :
(1) [The -economio] Economic incentives and cost-recovery
mechanisms described in section 269-6 (e);
(2) Volatility and affordability of electric rates and
customer electric bills;
2026-2428 SB2487 CDl SMA-l.docx 7
HIHnmiBIMIliM

Page 8
S.B. NO. ""
• H.D. 1
C.D. 1
(3) [El-Gcferic Dorvice-reliability/] Reliability of
electric service;
(4) [Customer] Level of customer engagement and
satisfaction, including customer options for managing
electricity costs;
(5) [TVeeeae-^jo] Accessibility of utility system
information, including [but not--limited-to publie
eeee-&s—fee] electric system planning data [eed]^
aggregated customer energy use data [ a nd- indi v i du-a-1-
eeeess—fee] , and granular information about an
individual customer's own energy use data;
(6) Rapid integration of renewable energy sources,
including quality interconnection of customer-sited
resources; and
(7) Timely execution of competitive procurement,
third-party interconnection, and other business
processes.
[(g)] (d) This section shall not apply to a member-owned
cooperative electric utility."
SECTION 4. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
2026-2428 SB2487 CDl SMA-l.docx

Page 9 S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-2428 SB2487 CDl SMA-l.docx 9
liMiiimiMiiigHiiiHii

2487
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 5th day of June ,2026

S.B. No. 2487, S.D. 1, H.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
184-26

SB No. 2487, SD 1, HD 1, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives